Utah statutes.
32A-6-103 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Qualifications.

(1)  Special use permits may be granted only to the following persons or organizations:

(a)  a religious wine use permit may be granted to a church or religious organization;

(b)  an industrial or manufacturing use permit may be granted to a person or organization engaged in an industrial or manufacturing pursuit;

(c)  a scientific or educational use permit may be granted to a person or organization engaged in a scientific or educational pursuit;

(d)  a health care facility use permit may be granted to a hospital or health care facility; and

(e)  a public service permit may be granted to an operator of an airline, railroad, or other public conveyance.

(2) (a)  The commission may not issue a special use permit to any person who has been convicted of:

(i)  a felony under any federal or state law;

(ii)  any violation of any federal or state law or local ordinance concerning the sale, manufacture, distribution, warehousing, adulteration, or transportation of alcoholic products;

(iii)  any crime involving moral turpitude; or

(iv)  on two or more occasions within the five years before the day on which the special use permit is granted, driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any drug.

(b)  In the case of a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company the  proscription under Subsection (2)(a) applies if any of the following has been convicted of any offense described in Subsection (2)(a):

(i)  a partner;

(ii)  a managing agent;

(iii)  a manager;

(iv)  an officer;

(v)  a director;

(vi)  a stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of an applicant corporation; or

(vii)  a member who owns at least 20% of an applicant limited liability company.

(c)  The proscription under Subsection (2)(a) applies if any person employed to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for a special use permittee has been convicted of any offense described in Subsection (2)(a).

(3)  The commission may immediately suspend or revoke a special use permit if after the day on which the special use permit is granted, a person described in Subsection (2)(a), (b), or (c):

(a)  is found to have been convicted of any offense described in Subsection (2)(a) prior to the permit being granted; or

(b)  on or after the day on which the permit is granted:

(i)  is convicted of an offense described in Subsection (2)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii); or

(ii) (A)  is convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any drug; and

(B)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any drug within five years before the day on which the person is convicted of the offense described in Subsection (3)(b)(ii)(A).

(4)  The director may take emergency action by immediately suspending the operation of a special use permit according to the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, for the period during which the criminal matter is being adjudicated if a person described in Subsection (2)(a), (b), or (c):

(a)  is arrested on a charge described in Subsection (2)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii); or

(b) (i)  is arrested on a charge for the offense of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any drug; and

(ii)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any drug within five years before the day on which the person is arrested on a charge described in Subsection (4)(b)(i).

(5) (a) (i)  The commission may not grant a special use permit to any person who has had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last three years.

(ii)  The commission may not grant a special use permit to any applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company if any partner, managing agent, manager, officer, director, stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation, or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability company is or was:

(A)  a partner or managing agent of any partnership that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last three years;

(B)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds or held at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of any corporation that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last three years; or

(C)  a manager or member who owns or owned at least 20% of any limited liability company that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last three years.

(b)  An applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company may not be granted a special use permit if any of the following had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked while acting in that person's individual capacity within the last three years:

(i)  any partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;

(ii)  any managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or

(iii)  any manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability company.

(c)  A person acting in an individual capacity may not be granted a special use permit if that person was:

(i)  a partner or managing agent of a partnership that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last three years;

(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who held at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of a corporation that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last three years; or

(iii)  a manager or member who owned at least 20% of a limited liability company that had any type of license, agency, or permit revoked within the last three years.

(6) (a)  A minor may not be:

(i)  granted a special use permit; or

(ii)  employed by a permittee to handle alcoholic beverages.

(b)  The commission may not grant a special use permit to an applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company if any of the following is a minor:

(i)  a partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;

(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or

(iii)  a manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability company.

(7)  If any person to whom a permit has been issued under this chapter no longer possesses the qualifications required by this title for obtaining that permit, the commission may suspend or revoke that permit.

